Hawaii statutes.
[§414-17] Appeal from department director's
refusal to file document. (a) If the department director refuses to file
a document delivered to the department director for filing, the domestic or
foreign corporation may appeal the refusal within thirty days after the return
of the document in the circuit court. The appeal is commenced by petitioning
the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the
document and the department director's explanation of the department director's
refusal to file.

(b) The court may summarily order the
department director to file the document or take other action the court
considers appropriate.

(c) The court's final decision may be appealed
as in other civil proceedings. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next